Alaska statutes. Title 5. Amusements and Sports.
Article 4. General Provisions.

Sec. 05.15.680.
Penalties.

A person who knowingly violates or aids or solicits a person to violate this chapter is guilty of a violation for the first offense and a class B misdemeanor for the second and each subsequent offense.

A person who, with the intent to mislead a public servant in the performance of the public servant’s duty, submits a false statement in an application for a permit, license, or vendor registration under this chapter is guilty of unsworn falsification in the second degree.

History.

(§ 7 ch 27 SLA 1960; am § 7 ch 59 SLA 1983; am § 35 ch 70 SLA 1993; am § 2 ch 42 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

05.15.200

. Renumbered in 1994.

Cross references. —

For fines and sentences for class B misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and AS

12.55.135

, respectively; for unsworn falsification, see AS

11.56.210

.

Sec. 05.15.690.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“adjusted gross income” means gross income less prizes awarded and state, federal, and municipal taxes paid or owed on the income;

“animal classic” means a game of chance in which prizes are awarded for the correct guess

of which numbered or colored hole on a wheel a rat, hamster, gerbil, or other rodent enters as the wheel is slowly rotated;

concerning an activity involving chicken manure and a numbered or lettered grid;

“authorizing permittee” means a municipality or qualified organization that authorizes an operator to conduct an activity subject to this chapter on its behalf;

“big bull moose derby” means a contest in which prizes are awarded based on the size or spread of moose antlers;

“bingo” means a game of chance of, and restricted to, the selling of rights to participate, and the awarding of prizes, in the specific kind of game of chance sometimes known as bingo or lotto, played with cards bearing numbers or other designations, five or more in one line, the holder covering numbers when objects similarly numbered are drawn from a receptacle, and the game being won by the person who first covers a previously designated arrangement of numbers on the card;

“cabbage classic” means a game of chance where a prize of money is awarded for the closest guess of the weight of the winning cabbage at the Giant Cabbage Weigh-Off at the Alaska State Fair in Palmer operated and administered by the Palmer Rotary Club;

“Calcutta pool” means a game of chance where a prize of money is awarded from a pool of wagers on a contest of skill limited to amateur and professional sporting events, other than horse racing, in the state in which those who wager bid at auction for the exclusive right to purchase or wager upon a particular contestant or entrant in the event;

“canned salmon classic” means a game of chance where a prize of money is awarded to the closest guess of the total number of cases of canned salmon that will be packed at the Petersburg salmon canneries during a certain period of time and is limited to the canned salmon classic operated and administered by the Petersburg Chamber of Commerce, Inc.;

“charitable organization” means an organization, not for pecuniary profit, that is operated for the relief of poverty, distress, or other condition of public concern in the state;

“civic or service organization” means any branch or lodge or chapter of a national or state organization that is a civic or service organization, not for pecuniary profit, and authorized by its written constitution, charter, or articles of incorporation, or bylaws to engage in a fraternal, civic, or service purpose in the state;

“contest of skill” means a contest or game in which prizes are awarded for the demonstration of human skills in marksmanship, races, and other athletic events;

“crane classic” means a game of chance in which a prize of money is awarded for the closest guess of the time of arrival of the first sandhill crane to a particular place;

“deep freeze classic” means a game of chance where a prize of money is awarded to the closest guess of the date, time, and temperature of the lowest temperature recorded at a specific location in the Delta Junction area on the coldest day during December through February, inclusive, and is limited to the deep freeze classic operated and administered by the Delta Chamber of Commerce;

“department” means the Department of Revenue;

“distribute” means sell, distribute, furnish, or supply;

“dog mushers’ association” means a civic, service, or charitable organization in the state, not for pecuniary profit, formed exclusively to promote interest in the breeding and training of dog teams for work or recreational and racing purposes, but does not include an organization formed or operated for gaming or gambling purposes;

“dog mushers’ contest” means a

contest in which prizes are awarded for the correct guess of the racing time of a dog team or of team position in the race, including prizes to the race contestants; or

a game of chance, conducted by a dog mushers’ association, in which a prize of money is awarded for the closest guess or guesses of at least three elements of uncertainty about a sled dog race that cannot be determined before the commencement of the race; of the three elements of uncertainty, one element must be identified as the primary determinant of success, with the other two elements being used as secondary and tertiary determinants if there are multiple correct guesses of the primary determinant;

“educational organization” means a civic, service, or charitable organization in the state, not for pecuniary profit, whose primary purpose is educational in nature and designed to develop the capabilities of individuals by instruction;

“established village” means an unincorporated community that is in

the unorganized borough and that has 25 or more permanent residents; or

an organized borough, has 25 or more permanent residents; and

is on a road system and is located more than 50 miles outside the boundary limits of a unified municipality; or

is not on a road system and is located more than 15 miles outside the boundary limits of a unified municipality;

“fish derby” means a contest in which prizes are awarded for catching fish;

“fraternal organization” means a civic, service, or charitable organization in the state, except a college or high school fraternity, not for pecuniary profit, that is a branch or lodge or chapter, of a national or state organization and exists for the common business, brotherhood, or other interest of its members;

“fund raiser or consultant” means a person who provides advice or technical assistance in support of or concerning the conduct of gaming activities under this chapter, whether the person is or is not an employee of a licensee;

“goose classic” means a game of chance where a prize of money is awarded for the closest guess of the time of the arrival of the first goose in spring to Creamer’s Field in Fairbanks or to the Kenai River flats near Kenai and is limited to the goose classics operated and administered

jointly or by either the Fairbanks Montessori Association or the Friends of Creamer’s Field; and

by the Kenai Chamber of Commerce;

“governing body” has the meaning given in AS

29.71.800

;

“gross receipts” means receipts from the sale of shares, tickets, or rights connected with participation in any activity permitted under this chapter or the right to participate, including admission, fee or charge, sale of equipment or supplies, and all other miscellaneous receipts;

“ice classic” means a game of chance where a prize of money is awarded for the closest guess of the time the ice moves in a body of water or watercourse in the state and is limited to the Nenana and Chena ice pools in the same manner as they were conducted in 1959 and previous years, a Kuskokwim Ice Classic to be operated and administered by Bethel Community Services Foundation, Inc., a Kenai River Ice Classic to be operated and administered by the Kenai and Soldotna Rotary Clubs jointly or by either the Kenai Rotary Club or the Soldotna Rotary Club, a Yukon River Ice Classic to be operated and administered by the City of Fort Yukon, an Alaska-Soviet Ice Classic to be operated and administered jointly by CAMAI, Inc., and the City of Diomede, a Big Lake Ice Classic to be operated and administered by the Houston Junior-Senior High School Booster Club and the Big Lake Chamber of Commerce jointly or by either the Houston Junior-Senior High School Booster Club or the Big Lake Chamber of Commerce, a McGrath Ice Classic to be operated and administered by the Kuskokwim Public Broadcasting Company, and the Snow Town Ice Classic to be operated and administered by the Advocates for Victims of Violence, Inc.;

“ideal net” means an amount equal to the total amount of receipts that would be received if every individual pull-tab ticket in a series were sold at face value, less the prizes to be awarded for that series;

“king salmon classic” means a game of chance where a prize of money is awarded for the closest guess of the time of the arrival of the first king salmon of the year at a designated spot on the fish ladder in the Douglas Island Pink and Chum hatchery at Salmon Creek in Juneau and is limited to the king salmon classic operated and administered by the Greater Juneau Chamber of Commerce;

“labor organization” means an organization, not for pecuniary profit, constituted wholly or partly to bargain collectively or deal with employers, including the state and its political subdivisions, concerning grievances, terms, or conditions of employment or other mutual aid or protection in connection with employees;

“managerial or supervisory capacity” means that the employee

is responsible for gaming receipts;

has the authority to hire employees or to dismiss or otherwise discipline them;

prepares financial reports required under this chapter;

is responsible for keeping the accounts for activities under this chapter;

is responsible for conducting activities under this chapter, including the arranging for locations at which those activities will occur; or

is a fund raiser or a consultant;

“mercury classic” means a game of chance where a prize of money is awarded for the closest guess of the time the temperature reaches a certain degree and is limited to the

Homer Mercury Classic operated and administered by the Boys and Girls Club of the Kenai Peninsula; and

mercury classic operated and administered by the Greater Fairbanks Chamber of Commerce or jointly, in the discretion of the Greater Fairbanks Chamber of Commerce, by the Greater Fairbanks Chamber of Commerce and the Fairbanks Convention and Visitors’ Bureau;

“net proceeds” means the gross receipts from an authorized activity less the fee described in AS

05.15.020(b)

, the expenses authorized by AS

05.15.160

, and the prizes awarded at the activity;

“numbers wheel” means any electronic, mechanical, or other device with numbers or other figures that are selected randomly and used in a game of chance in which the outcome is determined by the number or figure selected by the device; not including games in which a hamster or other animal is placed in an enclosure with several numbered exit holes and the winner is determined by which hole the hamster or other animal exits, or slot machines or other devices that operate by insertion of a coin or other object that may entitle the person operating the machine to receive a prize by strict dependence on the element of chance;

“operator” means a natural person who, or a municipality or qualified organization that, has obtained a license to conduct an activity subject to this chapter on behalf of a permittee;

“permittee” means a municipality or a qualified organization that holds a valid permit under AS

05.15.100

;

“police or fire department and company” means a civic, service, or charitable organization in the state, not for pecuniary profit, consisting of members of a police department or fire company established by the state or a political subdivision of the state;

“political organization” means an organization or club organized under or formally affiliated with a political party as defined in AS

15.80.010

;

“pull-tab game” means a game of chance where a card, the face of which is covered to conceal a number, symbol, or set of symbols, is purchased by the participant and where a prize is awarded for a card containing certain numbers or symbols designated in advance and at random;

“qualified organization” means a bona fide civic or service organization or a bona fide religious, charitable, fraternal, veterans, labor, political, or educational organization, police or fire department and company, dog mushers’ association, outboard motor association, or fishing derby or nonprofit trade association in the state, that operates without profits to its members and that has been in existence continually for a period of three years immediately before applying for the license or permit; the organization may be a firm, corporation, company, association, or partnership; in this paragraph, “fishing derby association” means a civic, service, or charitable organization in the state, not for pecuniary profit, whose primary purpose is to promote interest in fishing for recreational purposes, but does not include an organization formed or operated for gaming or gambling purposes;

“race classic” means a game of chance where prizes are awarded for the closest guess or guesses of the official winning times of a human race or races, and is limited to the

Mt. Marathon Race Classic operated and administered by the Seward Chamber of Commerce Convention and Visitors’ Bureau; and

Race to Alaska Classic operated and administered by the Greater Ketchikan Chamber of Commerce;

“raffle and lottery” means the selling of rights to participate and the awarding of prizes in a game of chance conducted by the drawing for prizes by lot;

“rain classic” means a game of chance in that a prize is awarded for the closest guess of the amount of precipitation that is recorded at a certain location during a certain length of time;

“religious organization” means an organization, church, body of communicants, or group, not for pecuniary profit, gathered in common membership for mutual support and edification in piety, worship, and religious observances, or a society, not for pecuniary profit, of individuals united for religious purposes at a definite place and that is recognized as a religious organization under the federal income tax laws and the selective service law;

“salmon classic” means a game of chance, to be operated and administered by the

United Fishermen of Alaska, in which a prize of money is awarded for the closest guess of the total number of salmon harvested commercially statewide, as determined by the Department of Fish and Game, during a certain period of time;

Seward Chamber of Commerce Convention and Visitors’ Bureau, in which prizes are awarded for the closest guess or guesses of the weight of the fish officially designated winner of the Seward Silver Salmon Derby Classic;

Sterling Area Senior Citizens, Inc., in which a prize of money is awarded for the closest guess of the total number of sockeye salmon crossing the counter operated by the Alaska Department of Fish and Game on the Kenai River as of a certain day and time; or

Bristol Bay Native Corporation Education Foundation, in which a prize of money is awarded for the closest guess of the total number of salmon harvested commercially in the five Bristol Bay commercial fishing districts between June 1 and September 30, as determined by the Department of Fish and Game;

“series” means a unit of pull-tabs with the same serial number;

“snow classic” means a game of chance in which a prize of money is awarded to the closest guess of the total snow accumulation on the ground at a specific location on Mount Alyeska on a specific date and time and is limited to the Alyeska Snow Classic operated and administered by Four Valleys Community School, Inc.;

“snow machine classic” means a (A) contest in which prizes are awarded for the correct guess of the racing time of a snow machine or of the snow machine’s position in the race, including prizes to the race contestants; or (B) game of chance where a prize of money is awarded for the closest guess or guesses of at least three elements of uncertainty about a snow machine race that cannot be determined before the commencement of the race; in this paragraph, “race” includes a race solely among snow machines or a race among teams consisting of a combination of a person involved in a contest of skill and a snow machine;

“vendor” means a business whose primary activity is not regulated by this chapter but that

is engaged in the sale of pull-tabs on behalf of a permittee;

holds a business license under AS 43.70; and

is an establishment holding a

beverage dispensary license under AS

04.11.090

that has not been designated by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board under AS

04.16.049(a)(2)

— (3), has not been exempted by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development under AS

04.16.049(c)

and AS

23.10.355

, and if the establishment is a hotel, motel, resort, or similar business that caters to the traveling public as a substantial part of its business, does not allow the sale of pull-tabs in a dining room, banquet room, guest room, or other public areas other than a room in which there is regularly maintained a fixed counter or service bar at which alcoholic beverages are sold or served to members of the public for consumption;

package store license under AS

04.11.150

;

“veterans organization” means a civic, service, or charitable organization in the state, or a branch or lodge or chapter of a national or state organization in the state, not for pecuniary profit, the membership of which consists of individuals who were members of the armed services or forces of the United States or persons who served in the Alaska Territorial Guard.

History.

(§ 1 ch 27 SLA 1960; am §§ 4, 5 ch 66 SLA 1976; am §§ 6 — 8 ch 27 SLA 1982; am § 8 ch 59 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 27 SLA 1985; am §§ 3, 4 ch 93 SLA 1986; am § 4 ch 94 SLA 1986; am §§ 23 — 35 ch 99 SLA 1988; am E.O. No. 74 §§ 4, 5 (1989); am § 1 ch 76 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 22 SLA 1990; am § 62 ch 21 SLA 1991; am § 5 ch 24 SLA 1991; am § 2 ch 93 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 30 SLA 1992; am § 36 ch 70 SLA 1993; am E.O. No. 82 §§ 14, 16 (1993); am § 4 ch 16 SLA 1994; am §§ 7, 8 ch 13 SLA 1995; am §§ 4, 5 ch 104 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 11 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 98 SLA 1996; am § 3 ch 32 SLA 1997; am § 2 ch 35 SLA 1997; am §§ 4, 5 ch 41 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 28 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 78 SLA 2001; am § 2 ch 149 SLA 2003; am § 4 ch 162 SLA 2004; am § 10 ch 43 SLA 2005; am § 6 ch 20 SLA 2008; am § 6 ch 62 SLA 2012; am §§ 5, 6 ch 22 SLA 2014; am § 2 ch 22 SLA 2015; am § 1 ch 94 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 05.15.210. Renumbered in 1994. Reorganized in 1983 to alphabetize the defined terms and in 1986, 1988, 1991, 1993, 1994, 1995, 1997, 2004, 2005, 2008, 2012, and 2014 to maintain alphabetical order. In 1994, in the definition of “vendor” “the business” was deleted from the beginning of (C) and “an establishment holding a” was deleted from the beginning of (C)(ii), to correct a manifest error in § 36,
ch. 70, SLA 1993.

In 1999, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in subparagraph (44)(C) (now (48)(C)) in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2010, in (37) of this section, “AS

15.80.010

” was substituted for “AS 15.60.010” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS 15.60.010.

In 2014, the definition for the term “fishing derby association” was incorporated into paragraph (39) where the term is used.

Administrative Code. —

For operators, see 15 AAC 160, art. 2.

For vendors, see 15 AAC 160, art. 3.

For raffles, lotteries, and other gaming activities, see 15 AAC 160, art. 7.

For suspension and revocation, see 15 AAC 160, art. 9.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective September 10, 2012, added (49) [now (46)].

The 2014 amendment, effective September 15, 2014, in (26), added “, and the Snow Town Ice Classic to be operated and administered by the Advocates for Victims of Violence, Inc.” at the end, and made a related change; added (50) [now (4)], and made related changes.

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, substituted “college or” for “college and” in (21).

The 2018 amendment, effective November 25, 2018, added (40)(B), and made related changes.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Under AS 05.15.210 (now see AS

05.15.690

) a permit may be issued which gives a qualified organization the privilege of conducting any of the designated activities. AS

05.15.040

limits the activities that may be conducted to those activities specified in the permit. Under AS

05.15.060

the commissioner [now department] has authority to further limit the number of activities which may be conducted pursuant to any permit.
Therefore, absent any regulation to the contrary, a permit could be issued for more than one activity to a qualified organization. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 8.

That the term “lottery” as used in item (29) (now (41)) of this section does not include an ice pool is indicated by the express provisions of item (18) (now (26)). 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 8.

While the conduct of an ice pool might come within the definition of a lottery, by the language in item (29) (now (41)) of this section, the legislature has limited a lottery to a game conducted by a drawing for prizes. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 8.

If the term lottery in item (29) (now (41)) of this section was meant to include an ice classic, then item (18) (now (26)) would be meaningless. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 8.

While there may have been other ice pools conducted prior to the date of this section, the language of item (18) (now (26)) showed that the legislature intended to authorize only two pools, the Nenana and Chena, and none other. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 8.

“Ice classics” are not exempt from the provisions of this title regulating games of chance generally.
April 16, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

By designating specific organizations to operate the Big Lake Ice Classic, HB 323 [ch. 22, SLA 1990] might violate the constitutional prohibition against local and special legislation since Alaska Const., art. II, § 19, provides in part, “The legislature shall pass no local or special act if a general act can be made applicable. April 17, 1990 Op. Att’y Gen.

Promotional latex game tickets constituted pull-tab games under this chapter even though an “information product” containing information about an arctic animal was attached to the game piece and free game pieces could be obtained by mailing a request to the company, since the company’s primary business was selling the game cards and the tickets had a prize structure much like traditional pull-tab games. September 2, 1992 Op. Att’y Gen.